Vermont, session 2025-2026, H758.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
VT LEG #385614 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.758
2026 Page 2 of 9
(1) Between 2017 and 2021, the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention reported 40,808 poisonings of humans from rodenticides, most of
whom were children under five years of age.
(2) In 2024, the American Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to
Animals’ Animal Poison Control Center reported that 31,570 domestic animals
in the United States suffered rodenticide poisoning, and that first-generation,
second-generation, and nonanticoagulant rodenticides were the seventh most
common toxin poisoning domestic animals.
(3) Wildlife such as raptors, fishers, foxes, coyotes, bobcats, and lynx
help regulate and control rodent populations and are essential to Vermont’s
ecosystems. From 2018 through 2022, the Vermont Department of Fish and
Wildlife tested fisher carcasses for rodenticide exposure and all had exposure
to at least one or more rodenticides. From 2021 through 2022, the Department
tested bobcat carcasses and found anticoagulant rodenticide exposure in 21 out
of 29 carcasses tested.
(4) Components of rodenticides can bioaccumulate in fish and wildlife,
aggregately and indirectly affecting species that are not the target of the
rodenticides.
(5) First- and second-generation anticoagulant rodenticides and
nonanticoagulant rodenticides can poison, harm, and kill rodents’ natural
VT LEG #385614 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.758
2026 Page 3 of 9
predators, thereby counteracting the regulation and control that natural
predators of rodents provide.
(6) The State of Vermont holds fish and wildlife in the State in trust for
the benefit of the citizens of Vermont pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 4081.
Sec. 2. 6 V.S.A. § 911 is amended to read:
§ 911. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(4) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.
(5) “Economic poison” means:
(A) any substance produced, distributed, or used for preventing,
destroying, or repelling any insects, rodents, nematodes, fungi, weeds, or other
forms of plant or animal life or viruses, except viruses on or in living humans
or other animals, that the Secretary shall declare to be a pest; or
(B) any substance produced, distributed, or used as a plant regulator,
defoliant, or desiccant.
* * *
(18) “Rodenticide” means any substance or mixture of substances
intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating rodents or any
other vertebrate animal that the Secretary shall declare to be a pest.
* * *
VT LEG #385614 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.758
2026 Page 4 of 9
(29) “Second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide” means any
rodenticide containing any one of the following active ingredients:
brodifacoum, bromadiolone, difenacoum, or difethialone.
(30) “First-generation anticoagulant rodenticide” means any rodenticide
containing any one of the following active ingredients: chlorophacinone,
diphacinone, or warfarin.
(31) “Nonanticoagulant rodenticide” means any rodenticide containing
any one of the following active ingredients: bromethalin, cholecalciferol, or
zinc phosphide.
Sec. 3. 6 V.S.A. § 918 is amended to read:
§ 918. REGISTRATION
(a) Every economic poison that is distributed, sold, or offered for sale
within this State or delivered for transportation or transported in intrastate
commerce or between points within this State through any point outside this
State shall be registered in the Office of the Secretary, and such registration
shall be renewed annually, provided that products that have the same formula
are manufactured by the same person, the labeling of which contains the same
claims, and the labels of which bear a designation identifying the product as
the same economic poison may be registered as a single economic poison, and
additional names and labels shall be added by supplemental statements during
the current period of registration. It is further provided that any economic
VT LEG #385614 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.758
2026 Page 5 of 9
poison imported into this State, which is subject to the provisions of any
federal act providing for the registration of economic poisons and that has been
duly registered under the provisions of this chapter, may, in the discretion of
the Secretary, be exempted from registration under this chapter when sold or
distributed in the unbroken immediate container in which it was originally
shipped. The registrant shall file with the Secretary a statement including:
* * *
(g) The Unless the use or sale of a rodenticide is otherwise prohibited, the
Secretary shall register as a restricted use pesticide any first-generation
anticoagulant rodenticide, second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide, and
nonanticoagulant rodenticide that is distributed, sold, sold into, or offered for
sale within the State or delivered for transportation or transported in intrastate
commerce or between points within this State through any point outside this
State.
Sec. 4. 6 V.S.A. § 1101 is amended to read:
§ 1101. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter unless context clearly requires otherwise:
* * *
(11) “Agricultural emergency” means an occurrence of any pest that
presents an imminent risk of significant harm, injury, or loss to agricultural
crops.
VT LEG #385614 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.758
2026 Page 6 of 9
* * *
(14) “Environmental emergency” means an occurrence of any pest that
presents a significant risk of harm or injury to the environment, or significant
harm, injury, or loss to agricultural crops, including any exotic or foreign pest
that may need preventative quarantine measures to avert or prevent that risk, as
determined by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.
* * *
(16) “Significant public health risk” means a public health risk of such
magnitude that the Secretary or local health officer has reason to believe that it
must be mitigated.
(17) “Environmentally sensitive area” means those areas that:
(A) are significant wetlands as defined in 10 V.S.A. § 902(11);
(B) are necessary wildlife habitat as defined in 10 V.S.A.
§ 6001(12); or
(C) contain endangered or threatened species or are critical habitat as
defined in 10 V.S.A. § 5401.
(18) “Second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide” has the same
meaning as in subdivision 911(29) of this title.
(19) “First-generation anticoagulant rodenticide” has the same meaning
as in subdivision 911(30) of this title.
VT LEG #385614 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.758
2026 Page 7 of 9
(20) “Nonanticoagulant rodenticide” has the same meaning as in
subdivision 911(31) of this title.
Sec. 5. 6 V.S.A. § 1114 is added to read:
§ 1114. RODENTICIDE PESTICIDES; PROHIBITED USES
(a) No person shall sell, offer for sale or use, distribute, or use any first- or
second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or nonanticoagulant rodenticide.
(b) The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, after consultation with
the Secretary of Natural Resources, may issue a written exemption order to
suspend the provisions of subsection (a) of this section if the Secretary
determines that:
(1) a valid environmental emergency, agricultural emergency, or
significant public health risk exists;
(2) the pesticide would be effective in addressing the environmental
emergency, agricultural emergency, or significant public health risk;
(3) no other, less harmful pesticide or pest management practice would
be effective in addressing the environmental emergency, agricultural
emergency, or significant public health risk; and
(4) any significant adverse effects to nontarget wildlife and
environmentally sensitive areas are mitigated to the greatest extent practicable.
(c) A written exemption order issued under subsection (b) of this section
shall:
VT LEG #385614 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.758
2026 Page 8 of 9
(1) not be valid for more than six months;
(2) specify the rodenticides and uses of the rodenticides to which the
exemption order applies; the date on which the exemption order takes effect;
the exemption order’s duration; and the exemption order’s geographic scope,
which may include specific farms, fields, or properties;
(3) provide a detailed evaluation determining that an agricultural
emergency, environmental emergency, or significant public health risk exists;
and
(4) establish restrictions related to the use of the rodenticides to which
the exemption order applies to minimize harm to environmentally sensitive
areas, nontarget mammals, bird populations, and public health.
(d) A written exemption order issued under subsection (b) of this section
may establish other restrictions related to the use of the rodenticides to which
the exemption order applies that the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets considers necessary.
(e) Upon issuing a written exemption order under subsection (b) of this
section, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall submit a copy of
the exemption order to the House Committees on Environment and on
Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and Forestry; the Senate Committees on Natural
Resources and Energy and on Agriculture; and the Agricultural Innovation
VT LEG #385614 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.758
2026 Page 9 of 9
Board. The General Assembly shall post the written exemption order to the
website of the General Assembly.
(f) The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, after consultation with
the Secretary of Natural Resources, may rescind any written exemption order
issued under subsection (b) of this section at any time. Such rescission shall
come into effect not earlier than 15 days after its issuance.
Sec. 6. 6 V.S.A. § 1114a is added to read:
§ 1114a. RULEMAKING; RODENTICIDE
On or before January 1, 2027, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets shall adopt rules to ensure that the use of first-generation
anticoagulant rodenticides, second-generation anticoagulant rodenticides, and
nonanticoagulant rodenticides by certified pesticide applicators shall not result
in significant adverse effects to nontarget wildlife and environmentally
sensitive areas. As used in this section, “significant adverse effect” means a
direct or indirect activity that negatively affects the health or viability of a
wildlife population or that damages or threatens wildlife habitat or another
environmentally sensitive area.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #385614 v.4